Illinois, session 104th, SB512.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Vehicle Use Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 617/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the State 8Vehicle Use Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-922, eff. 1-1-13.)